Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-471
Memory care endorsement; application; qualifications.

(1) An assisted-living facility may apply to the department for a memory care endorsement on a form prescribed by the department. Only an assisted-living facility which qualifies for the endorsement may advertise itself as an endorsed memory care facility and may qualify for reimbursement rates established pursuant to section 71-473.

(2) In order to qualify for the memory care endorsement, an assisted-living facility shall provide proof of meeting the qualifications established by the department pursuant to section 71-472.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 20.